Washington statutes.
RCW 18.04.080

Compensation and travel expenses of members.

Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the discharge of such duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 1984 c 287 s 20; 1983 c 234 s 22; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 25; 1949 c 226 s 7; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 8269-14.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.